Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.705

Purpose.

The purpose of RCW 11.130.700 through 11.130.755 is to recognize a less restrictive alternative to guardianship for adults with disabilities who need assistance with decisions regarding daily living.

[ 2020 c 312 s 602.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.